Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3299
District; recreation area; permit sales; violation; penalty.

(1) A district may permit the sale, trade, or vending of any goods, products, or commodities of any type in a recreation area.

(2) Any person who sells, trades, or vends any goods, products, or commodities of any type in a recreation area when not permitted by the district shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1984, LB 861, § 11.